District of Columbia statutes.
23-553

Authorization for disclosure and use of intercepted wire or oral communications.

(a)

Any investigative or law enforcement officer who, by any authorized means and in conformity with this subchapter, has obtained knowledge of the contents of any wire or oral communication, or evidence derived therefrom, may disclose or use such contents or evidence to the extent that such disclosure or use is appropriate to the proper performance of his official duties.

(b)

Any person who, by any authorized means and in conformity with this subchapter, has obtained knowledge of the contents of any wire or oral communication intercepted in accordance with this subchapter, or other lawful authority, or evidence derived therefrom, may disclose the contents of such communication or evidence while giving testimony under oath or affirmation in any criminal trial, hearing, or proceeding before any grand jury or court.

(c)

The contents of any wire or oral communication intercepted in conformity with this subchapter, or evidence derived therefrom, may otherwise be disclosed or used only by court order upon a showing of good cause.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 625, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 23-548, § 23-549, and § 23-556.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-553.
1973 Ed., § 23-553.